Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 27 Severability; Repeals

§ 22-27-101.
Provisions severable.

If any provision of this act [§§

22-1-101

through

22-27-101

] or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of this act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application; and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-426.